Hawaii statutes.
[§556A-8] Disclosure of other digital
assets of deceased user. Unless the user prohibited disclosure of digital
assets or the court directs otherwise, a custodian shall disclose to the
personal representative of the estate of a deceased user a catalogue of
electronic communications sent or received by the user and digital assets,
other than the content of electronic communications, of the user, if the
personal representative gives the custodian:

(1) A written request for disclosure in physical or
electronic form;

(2) A certified copy of the death certificate of the
user;

(3) A certified copy of the letter of appointment of
the personal representative or a small estate affidavit or court order; and

(4) If requested by the custodian:

(A) A number, username, address, or other
unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify
the user's account;

(B) Evidence linking the account to the user;

(C) An affidavit stating that disclosure of
the user's digital assets is reasonably necessary for administration of the
estate; or

(D) A finding by the court that:

(i) The user had a specific account with the
custodian, identifiable by the information specified in subparagraph (A); or

(ii) Disclosure of the user's digital assets is
reasonably necessary for administration of the estate. [L 2016, c 162, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next